test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v43_hantteerata_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - hantteerata - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     hantteerata+V+Inf: hantteerata
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hantteeraan
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: hantteeraat
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hantteeraa
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: hantteeraama
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: hantteeraatta
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hantteerathaan
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hantteerasin
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: hantteerasit
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [hantteeras, hantteerasi] 
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: hantteerasima
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: hantteerasitta
     hantteerata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: hantteerathiin
     hantteerata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: hantteerannu
     hantteerata+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: hantteerattu
     hantteerata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: hantteeranheet
     hantteerata+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: hantteeraava
     hantteerata+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: hantteeraavat
     hantteerata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: hantteerattava
     hantteerata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: hantteerattavat

     hantteerata+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: hantteeraisin
     hantteerata+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: hantteeraisit
     hantteerata+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: hantteerais
     hantteerata+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: hantteeraisima
     hantteerata+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: hantteeraisitta
     hantteerata+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: hantteerattais
     hantteerata+V+Pass+Cond: hantteerattais

     hantteerata+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: hantteeraa
     hantteerata+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: hantteeraakkaa

     hantteerata+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: hantteeraamassa
     hantteerata+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: hantteeraamasta
     hantteerata+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: hantteeraamhaan
     hantteerata+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: hantteeraamala
     hantteerata+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: hantteeraamatta
